Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB672.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 35 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a chapter to read:CHAPTER 55ALEAD EXPOSURE AND POISONINGSec.55A01. Scope of chapter.55A02. Definitions.55A03. Educational materials.§ 55A01. Scope of chapter.This chapter relates to lead exposure and poisoning.§ 55A02. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the 12345678910111213141516171819 context clearly indicates otherwise:"Child." An individual under 21 years of age who is a resident of this Commonwealth."Department." The Department of Health of the Commonwealth."Health care practitioner." As defined in section 103 of the act of July 19, 1979 (P.L.130, No.48), known as the Health Care Facilities Act."Plumbing component." Any pipe, pipe fitting, plumbing fitting, solder, flux or fixture through which drinking water may pass.§ 55A03. Educational materials.(a) Lead screenings.--(1) The department shall develop and distribute readily understandable information and educational and instructional materials regarding risk factors associated with lead exposure, emphasizing lead screening and testing procedures required by law. The materials shall be provided to:(i) The parent or guardian of a child by:(A) A health care practitioner. (B) A health care practitioner at a health care facility where the child was born at the time of discharge or the health care practitioner who assisted with the birth if the child is born outside of a health care facility.(C) A health care practitioner at the time of a child's six-month checkup or the first checkup after the child attains the age of six months.(D) A school at the time of a child's first enrollment at the school.(ii) An expectant parent at any prenatal visit.20250SB0672PN0805 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) Lead educational materials shall be provided without cost to the parent or guardian of the child or to a pregnant woman and may be made available in a downloadable format on the department's publicly accessible Internet website.(b) Lead poisoning posters and brochures.--(1) A retailer, store or commercial establishment that offers paint or other supplies intended for the removal of paint shall display a poster in a prominent and easily visible location and make available to customers brochures containing statements that the dry sanding or scraping of paint in dwellings built before 1978 is dangerous and that the improper removal of old paint is a significant source of lead dust and the primary cause of lead poisoning. The poster and brochure shall inform consumers about where they may obtain more information on lead poisoning and paint removal.(2) A retailer, store or commercial establishment that offers plumbing components shall display a poster in a prominent and easily visible location and make brochures available to customers which contain statements that plumbing components and plumbing systems containing lead are dangerous and can contribute to lead poisoning of drinking water. The poster and brochure shall inform consumers about where they may obtain more information on lead poisoning and drinking water.(3) The department shall produce posters and brochures to meet the requirements under paragraphs (1) and (2) and shall provide paper copies to retailers, stores and commercial establishments and post copies for downloading on the department's publicly accessible Internet website. A retailer, store or commercial establishment may display 20250SB0672PN0805 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 posters and provide brochures that differ from those provided by the department if the posters and brochures provide the information required under paragraphs (1) and (2) and may create one poster combining the information required under paragraphs (1) and (2), if appropriate.(4) A retailer, store or commercial establishment described under paragraphs (1) and (2) shall also provide the requisite information on its publicly accessible Internet website.(5) A retailer, store or commercial establishment described under paragraphs (1) and (2) that offers paint or plumbing supplies through an online retail site to residents of this Commonwealth shall provide similar notification on its publicly accessible Internet website.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0672PN0805 - 4 - 123456789101112131415